Utah statutes.
72-4-110.   State highways -- SR-42 to SR-46, SR-48, SR-50.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-42.  From the Utah-Idaho state line near Strevell, Idaho, easterly to Route 30 at Curlew Junction.

(2)  SR-43.  From the Utah-Wyoming state line about 6-1/2 miles west of Manila easterly through Manila to the Utah-Wyoming state line about three miles east of Manila.

(3)  SR-44.  From Route 191 at Greendale Junction northwesterly to Route 43 in Manila.

(4)  SR-45.  From the Evacuation Wash Area south of Bonanza northwesterly through Bonanza to Route 40 southeast of Vernal, near Naples.

(5)  SR-46.  From Route 191 at LaSal Junction easterly to the Utah-Colorado state line.

(6)  SR-48.  From the Kennecott gate in Copperton northeasterly to 7800 South then easterly on 7800 South to Route 68 in West Jordan; then beginning again at Route 68 easterly on 7000 South and 7200 South to Route 89.

(7)  SR-50.  From Route 6 in Delta southeasterly to Holden, then northerly to Route 15 and beginning again at Route 15 Scipio Interchange; then easterly through Scipio and southeasterly to junction with Route 89 in Salina.

